Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2405
Interpreters;
oath.

Every interpreter, except those certified under the rules of the Supreme
Court and who have taken the prescribed oath of office, appointed
pursuant to sections 25-2401 to 25-2407, before entering upon his or her duties
as such, shall take an oath that he or she will, to the best of his or her
skill and judgment, make a true interpretation to such person unable to communicate
the English language of all the proceedings in a language which such person
understands and that he or she will, in the English language, repeat the statements
of such person to the court, jury, or officials before whom such proceeding
takes place.

Laws 1973, LB 116, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 15;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 14.

A court interpreter is not required to recite an oath at the beginning of each proceeding if the interpreter is already certified under the rules of the Nebraska Supreme Court. State v. Garcia, 27 Neb. App. 705, 936 N.W.2d 1 (2019).

A trial court can accept, without further inquiry, an interpreter's representation that he or she is a certified court interpreter. State v. Garcia, 27 Neb. App. 705, 936 N.W.2d 1 (2019).